California, session 20252026, AB1024.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Chapter 5.5 (commencing with Section 1595) is added to Division 2 of the Fish and Game Code, to read: CHAPTER 5.5. San Gabriel Valley Bear Management and Community Safety Act1595. This chapter shall be known, and may be cited, as the San Gabriel Valley Bear Management and Community Safety Act.1595.1. (a) On or before January 1, 2027, the department shall develop a regional plan specific to the cities located within the San Gabriel Valley in the County of Los Angeles to address issues relating to bears in the community.(b) The plan shall include all of the following information:(1) An overview of the behaviors of the bears in the San Gabriel Mountains.(2) Potential causes leading to bears entering neighborhoods and homes.(3) An analysis of the various city ordinances and procedures related to addressing the issue of urban bear encounters.(4) Best practices that cities should adopt to reduce urban bear encounters.(5) A reassessment of the department’s bear classifications to inform local response procedures.(c) The department shall post the plan described in this section on its internet website.1595.2. (a) The department shall establish measurable performance goals for reducing bear encounters within the cities located in the San Gabriel Valley in the County of Los Angeles.(b) The department shall submit a report containing the measurable performance goals to the Legislature on or before January 1, 2027.(c) (1) The requirement for submitting a report to the Legislature imposed under subdivision (b) is inoperative on January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.(2) A report to be submitted to the Legislature pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.1595.3. The department shall tag and track any bear that enters a residential neighborhood in a city located within the San Gabriel Valley in the County of Los Angeles using innovative technologies, such as a global positioning system (GPS) tracking collar or an artificial intelligence (AI) based tracking system, in order to monitor the bear after relocation.SEC. 2. The Legislature finds and declares that a special statute is necessary and that a general statute cannot be made applicable within the meaning of Section 16 of Article IV of the California Constitution because of the increase in bear encounters within communities within the San Gabriel Valley in the County of Los Angeles.